Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-302.5 Managed care option.
(a) An insurer may offer, and provide at the option of the named insured,
the personal injury protection benefits through managed care providers such as
a health maintenance organization or preferred provider organization. The
option may include conditions and limitations to coverage, including
deductibles and coinsurance requirements, as approved by the commissioner. The
commissioner shall approve those conditions and limitations if the benefits are
substantially comparable to or exceed the requirements of section 431:10C‑103.5.

(b) An insurer offering the coverages
authorized under subsection (a) shall demonstrate in rate filings submitted to
the commissioner the savings to the insured to be realized under subsection
(a). [L 1997, c 251, pt of §2; am L 1998, c 275, §19]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next